North Carolina, session 2025, SB477.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
NATURAL HERITAGE PROGRAM DATA CONFIDENTIALITY
SECTION 1.(a) The Nature Preserves Act, Part 42 of Article 2 of Chapter 143B of
the General Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to read:
"§ 143B-135.275. Confidentiality of rare species and sensitive natural habitat information.
Information concerning the nature and location of any (i) rare species of plants or animals or
(ii) sensitive natural habitats may be made available to the public under Chapter 132 of the
General Statutes or under any other provision of law, regardless of whether the rare species or
sensitive natural habitats are located on public or private property, unless the Department of
Natural and Cultural Resources determines that the disclosures would create a risk of harm, theft,
or destruction to those species or habitats."
SECTION 1.(b) This section is effective when it becomes law.
STANDARDS FOR VISITOR CONDUCT EXEMPTED FROM RULE MAKING
SECTION 2. G.S. 150B-1(d) reads as rewritten:
"(d) Exemptions from Rule Making. – Article 2A of this Chapter does not apply to the
following:
…
(27a) The Department of Natural and Cultural Resources in developing standards
and rules of conduct governing visitors to sites owned or managed by the
Department.
…."
EXTENDED LEASE TERMS FOR STATE RECREATION AREAS
SECTION 3. Pursuant to G.S. 146-25(b) and G.S. 146-29(b), the General Assembly
authorizes the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources to enter into leases for a period
greater than 30 years, but no more than 50 years, of lands owned by the federal government and
managed by the Department as the Falls Lake, Jordan Lake, and Kerr Lake State Recreation
Areas.
MODERNIZE HISTORICAL PUBLICATIONS STATUTE
SECTION 4. G.S. 121-6 reads as rewritten:
"§ 121-6. Historical publications.
…
(b) Editing and Publishing of Official Messages and Other Papers of Governor. – During
the term of office of each Governor of this State, a copy of all official messages delivered to the
General Assembly, addresses, speeches, statements, news releases, proclamations, executive
*S477-v-5*

orders, weekly calendars, articles, transcripts of news conferences, lists of appointments, and
other official releases and papers of the Governor shall be kept in the Governor's office for
delivery to the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources at the end of each quarter during
the Governor's administration. These papers shall be compiled and a selection made therefrom
by a skilled and competent editor. The editor shall edit, according to acceptable scholarly
standards, the selected materials which shall be published in a documentary volume as soon as
practicable after the conclusion of the term of office of each Governor. If, for any reason, a
Governor serves less than a full term, a documentary volume shall be edited and published for
such portion of a term as he shall have served. If a Governor serves more than one term, a
documentary volume shall be edited and published for each term served. Funds for editorial
assistance, printing, binding, and distribution shall may be paid from the Contingency and
Emergency Fund. The number of copies of each volume to be printed shall be determined by the
Department of Natural and Cultural Resources in consultation with the Governor whose papers
are being published.
(c) It shall be the duty and the responsibility for the Department of Natural and Cultural
Resources to edit and publish a second or new series of the most significant records of colonial
North Carolina. From records which have been compiled in the North Carolina State Archives
concerning the colonial period of North Carolina, a selection of the most significant documents
shall be made therefrom by a skilled and competent editor. The editor shall edit, according to
acceptable scholarly standards, the selected materials which shall be published in documentary
volumes not to exceed approximately 700 pages each in length until full and representative
published colonial records of North Carolina shall have been achieved. The number of copies of
each volume to be so printed shall be determined by the Department of Natural and Cultural
Resources, and such determination shall be based on the number of copies the Department can
reasonably expect to sell in a period of 10 years from the date of publication. In any year during
which the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources has completed a volume and has it
ready for publication, the Department may include in its base budget for that year sufficient funds
to pay the estimated costs of publishing the volume. In the event that the volume is not published
during that year, the appropriation made, or any unencumbered balance, shall revert to the general
fund.General Fund."
SYMPHONY STATUTORY REVISIONS
SECTION 5.(a) G.S. 126-5(c11) reads as rewritten:
"(c11) The following are exempt from (i) the classification and compensation rules
established by the State Human Resources Commission pursuant to G.S. 126-4(1) through (4);
(ii) G.S. 126-4(5) only as it applies to hours and days of work, vacation, and sick leave; (iii)
G.S. 126-4(6) only as it applies to promotion and transfer; (iv) G.S. 126-4(10) only as it applies
to the prohibition of the establishment of incentive pay programs; and (v) Article 2 of Chapter
126 of the General Statutes, except for G.S. 126-7.1:
(1) The Office of the Commissioner of Banks and its employees.
(2) The following employees of the Department of Natural and Cultural
Resources:
a. Director and Associate Directors of the North Carolina Museum of
History.
b. Program Chiefs and Curators.
c. Regional History Museum Administrators and Curators.
d. Employees assigned to assist the North Carolina
Symphony.Symphony Society, Incorporated.
e. Director, Associate Directors, and Curators of Tryon Palace.
f. Director, Associate Directors, and Curators of Transportation
Museum.
Page 2 Session Law 2025-10 Senate Bill 477

g. Director and Associate Directors of the North Carolina Arts Council.
h. Director, Assistant Directors, and Curators of the Division of State
Historic Sites.
…."
SECTION 5.(b) G.S. 143B-94 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143B-94. North Carolina Symphony Society, Inc.
The North Carolina Symphony Society, Incorporated, Incorporated, is not a State agency
within the meaning of this Chapter and is exempt from all provisions of this Chapter other than
this section. The North Carolina Symphony Society, Incorporated, shall continue to be under
eligible to receive the patronage of the State as provided in Article 2 of Chapter 140 of the
General Statutes of North Carolina. The governing body of the North Carolina Symphony
Society, Incorporated, shall be a board of trustees consisting of not less than 16 members of
which the Governor of the State and the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall be ex officio
members and four other members shall be named by the Governor. The remaining trustees shall
be chosen by members of the North Carolina Symphony Society, Incorporated, in such manner
and for such terms as that body shall determine. The initial members named by the Governor
shall be appointed from the members of the existing board of trustees of the North Carolina State
Symphony Society, Incorporated, for the balance of their existing terms. Subsequent
appointments shall be made for terms of four years each."
EXPAND AND CODIFY FREE SCHOOL GROUP ADMISSION
SECTION 6.(a) Article 2 of Chapter 143B of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 143B-53.15. Free admission for school groups.
The Department of Natural and Cultural Resources may not impose fees on school groups
visiting sites owned or managed by the Department. For purposes of this section, "fees" refers to
any regular admission charge and does not include activity fees or a separate admission charge
for special or temporary exhibitions."
SECTION 6.(b) Section 14.11(g) of S.L. 2015-241 is repealed.
REPEAL OBSOLETE REPORTING REQUIREMENTS
SECTION 7.(a) G.S. 121-12.1 is repealed.
SECTION 7.(b) G.S. 143-406 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143-406. Duties of Department of Natural and Cultural Resources.
The Department of Natural and Cultural Resources shall take action to carry out the following
purposes as funds and staff permit:
(1) Study, collect, maintain, and otherwise disseminate factual data and pertinent
information relative to the arts;
(2) Assist local organizations and the community at large with needs, resources
and opportunities in the arts;
(3) Serve as an agency through which various public and nonpublic organizations
concerned with the arts can exchange information, coordinate programs and
stimulate joint endeavors;
(4) Identify research needs, encourage research and assist in obtaining funds for
research;
(5) Assist in bringing the highest obtainable quality in the arts to the State;
promote the maximum opportunity for the people to experience, enjoy, and
profit from those arts.
By February 15 of each odd-numbered year, the Department of Natural and Cultural
Resources shall, in addition to such other recommendations, studies, and plans as it may submit
from time to time, submit a biennial report of progress to the Governor, the Joint Legislative
Senate Bill 477 Session Law 2025-10 Page 3

Oversight Committee on Agriculture and Natural and Economic Resources, the chairs of the
Senate Appropriations Committee on Agriculture, Natural, and Economic Resources, the chairs
of the House of Representatives Appropriations Committee on Agriculture and Natural and
Economic Resources, and the Fiscal Research Division."
STATE NATURE AND HISTORIC PRESERVE ADDITIONS AND DELETIONS
SECTION 8. G.S. 143-260.10 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143-260.10. Components of State Nature and Historic Preserve.
The following are components of the State Nature and Historic Preserve accepted by the
North Carolina General Assembly pursuant to G.S. 143-260.8:
(1) All lands and waters within the boundaries of the following units of the State
Parks System as of May 2, 2023: May 6, 2025: Baldhead Island State Natural
Area, Bakers Lake State Natural Area, Bay Tree Lake State Natural Area,
Bear Paw State Natural Area, Beech Creek Bog State Natural Area, Bob's
Creek State Natural Area, Bullhead Mountain State Natural Area, Bushy Lake
State Natural Area, Carolina Beach State Park, Cliffs of the Neuse State Park,
Chowan Swamp State Natural Area, Deep River State Trail, Dismal Swamp
State Park, Elk Knob State Park, Fonta Flora State Trail, Fort Fisher State
Recreation Area, Fort Macon State Park, Goose Creek State Park, Grandfather
Mountain State Park, Haw River State Park, Hammocks Beach State Park,
Jones Lake State Park, Lake Norman State Park, Lea Island State Natural
Area, Medoc Mountain State Park, Merchants Millpond State Park, Mount
Mitchell State Park, Northern Peaks State Trail, Pettigrew State Park, Pilot
Mountain State Park, Pineola Bog State Natural Area, Pisgah View State Park,
Raven Rock State Park, Run Hill State Natural Area, Salmon Creek State
Natural Area, Sandy Run Savannas State Natural Area, Singletary Lake State
Park, Stone Mountain State Park, Sugar Mountain State Natural Area,
Theodore Roosevelt State Natural Area, Warwick Mill Bay State Natural
Area, Weymouth Woods-Sandhills State Natural Area, Wilderness Gateway
State Trail, and Yellow Mountain State Natural Area.
(2) All lands and waters within the boundaries of William B. Umstead State Park
as of May 2, 2023, May 6, 2025, with the exception of the following tracts.
The tracts excluded from the State Nature and Historic Preserve under this
subdivision are deleted from the State Parks System in accordance with
G.S. 143B-135.54. The State of North Carolina may only exchange this land
for other land for the expansion of William B. Umstead State Park or sell and
use the proceeds for that purpose. The State of North Carolina may not
otherwise sell or exchange this land. [The tracts are as follows:]
a. Tract Number 65, containing 22.93140 acres as shown on a survey
prepared by John S. Lawrence (RLS) and Bennie R. Smith (RLS),
entitled "Property of The State of North Carolina William B. Umstead
State Park", dated January 14, 1977 and filed in the State Property
Office, which was removed from the State Nature and Historic
Preserve by Chapter 450, Section 1 of the 1985 Session Laws.
b. The portion of that certain tract or parcel of property at William B.
Umstead State Park in Wake County, described in Deed Book 13337,
Page 2379, and containing 0.15 acres as shown on the survey prepared
by Robert T. Newcomb (RLS) entitled "Property of Robert J.
Demartini," dated August 1981.
(3) Repealed by Session Laws 1999-268, s. 2.
Page 4 Session Law 2025-10 Senate Bill 477

(4) All lands within the boundaries of Morrow Mountain State Park as of May 2,
2023, May 6, 2025, with the exception of the following tract: That certain tract
or parcel of land at Morrow Mountain State Park in Stanly County, North
Albemarle Township, containing 0.303 acres, more or less, as surveyed and
platted by Thomas W. Harris R.L.S., on a map dated August 27, 1988, and
filed in the State Property Office, reference to which is hereby made for a
more complete description.
(5) Repealed by Session Laws 1999-268, s. 2.
(6) All land within the boundaries of Crowders Mountain State Park as of May 2,
2023, May 6, 2025, with the exception of the following tracts. The tracts
excluded from the State Nature and Historic Preserve under this subdivision
are deleted from the State Parks System in accordance with G.S. 143B-135.54.
The State of North Carolina may only exchange this land for other land for
the expansion of Crowders Mountain State Park or sell this land and use the
proceeds for that purpose. The State may not otherwise sell or exchange this
land. [The tracts are as follows:]
a. The portion of that certain tract or parcel of land at Crowders Mountain
State Park in Gaston County, Crowders Mountain Township,
described in Deed Book 1939, page 800, and containing 757.28 square
feet and as shown in a survey by Tanner and McConnaughey, P.A.
dated July 22, 1988 and filed in the State Property Office.
b. Repealed by Session Laws 2022-31, s. 1, effective June 30, 2022.
c. The portion of that certain tract or parcel of land at Crowders Mountain
State Park in Cleveland County, described in Deed Book 1286, Page
No. 85, located on the north side of SR 2245 (Bethlehem Road) and
containing 14,964 square feet as shown on the survey entitled "Survey
for Crowders Mountain State Park, Deed Book 1103-107, Township 4
Kings Mountain, Cleveland County, N.C." by David W. Dickson, P.A.
dated February 28, 2008.
d. The portion of that certain tract or parcel of land at Crowders Mountain
State Park in Cleveland County, described in Deed Book 1286, Page
85, and containing 0.06 acres and 0.515 acres as shown on the survey
entitled "Boundary Survey for the State of N.C. Department of
Administration, Township No. Four Cleveland County, N.C." by
Carolinas Design Group, PLLC, dated November 6, 2007.
e. Repealed by Session Laws 2022-31, s. 1, effective June 30, 2022.
f. The portion of that certain tract or parcel of property at Crowders
Mountain State Park in Gaston County, Crowders Mountain
Township, described in Deed Book 1240, Page 451, and containing
225 square feet as shown in a survey prepared by R&W Engineering
and Surveying entitled "Conveyance of 0.0052 acres owned by
Crowders Mountain State Park, Gaston Co., NC" and dated January
18, 1995.
(7) All lands owned in fee simple by the State within the boundaries of New River
State Park as of May 2, 2023, May 6, 2025, with the exception of the following
tracts:
a. The portion of that certain tract or parcel of land at New River State
Park in Ashe County, Chestnut Hill Township, described in Deed
Book 432, Page 724, and containing 44,033 square feet as shown on
the survey prepared by Thomas Herman Company, PLLC and entitled
"Survey for State of North Carolina, Division of Parks and Recreation;
Senate Bill 477 Session Law 2025-10 Page 5

Harold Davis; and Joe Davis" dated March 24, 2017, and on file with
the State Property Office.
b. The portion of that certain tract or parcel of land at New River State
Park in Ashe County, Obids Township, described in Deed Book 497,
Page 371, and containing 10,014 square feet as shown on the drawings
prepared for North Carolina Department of Transportation Project
HB-0054 by TGS Engineers, Inc., and on file with the State Property
Office.
(8) Repealed by Session Laws 2022-31, s. 1, effective June 30, 2022.
(9) All lands and waters located within the boundaries of the following State
Historic Sites as of May 2, 2023: May 6, 2025: Alamance Battleground,
Charles B. Aycock Birthplace, Historic Bath, Bennett Place, Bentonville
Battleground, Brunswick Town/Fort Anderson, C.S.S. Neuse and Governor
Caswell Memorial, Charlotte Hawkins Brown Memorial, Duke Homestead,
Historic Edenton, Fort Dobbs, Fort Fisher, Historic Halifax, Horne Creek
Living Historical Farm, House in the Horseshoe, North Carolina
Transportation Museum, President James K. Polk, Reed Gold Mine, Shallow
Ford of the Yadkin, Somerset Place, Historic Stagville, State Capitol, Thomas
Day House/Union Tavern, Town Creek Indian Mound, Tryon Palace Historic
Sites and Gardens, Zebulon B. Vance Birthplace, Endor Iron Furnace, and
Thomas Wolfe Memorial, with the exception of the following tracts:
a. The parcel of property at Tryon Palace Historic Sites and Gardens in
Craven County, described in Deed Book 1740, Page 575, and located
at 308 George Street, New Bern, North Carolina, 28562.
b. The portion of that certain tract or parcel of property at Tryon Palace
Historic Sites and Gardens in Craven County, described in Deed Book
1248, Page 699, and containing approximately 4,250 square feet as
shown on a survey prepared by Rivers & Associates, Inc., entitled
"Easement Survey Map for: The City of New Bern Permanent Utility
and Maintenance Easement, State of North Carolina (State Property
Office) 116 West Jones Street, Raleigh, NC 27603," dated April 24,
2017.
(10), (11) Repealed by Session Laws 2001-217, s. 2, effective June 15, 2001.
(12) All lands and waters located within the boundaries of Hanging Rock State
Park as of May 2, 2023, May 6, 2025, with the exception of the following
tracts:
a. The portion of that tract or property at Hanging Rock State Park in
Stokes County, Danbury Township, described in Deed Book 360, Page
160, for a 30-foot wide right-of-way beginning approximately 183 feet
south of SR 1001 and extending in a southerly direction approximately
1,479 feet to the southwest corner of the Bobby Joe Lankford tract and
more particularly shown on a survey entitled, "J. Spot Taylor Heirs
Survey, Danbury Township, Stokes County, N.C.", by Grinski
Surveying Company, dated June 1985, and filed in the State Property
Office. The tract excluded from the State Nature and Historic Preserve
under this subdivision is deleted from the State Parks System in
accordance with G.S. 143B-135.54.
b. The portion of that certain tract or parcel of property at Hanging Rock
State Park in Stokes County, described in Deed Book 267, Page 159,
and containing 1.53 acres as shown on the survey entitled "Plat of
Survey for NC Division of Parks and Recreation showing Camp
Page 6 Session Law 2025-10 Senate Bill 477

Sertoma Tracts"' by C.E Robertson and Associates, PC, revised April
6, 2016. The tract excluded from the State Nature and Historic
Preserve under this subdivision is deleted from the State Parks System
in accordance with G.S. 143B-135.54. The State of North Carolina
may only exchange this land for other land for the expansion of
Hanging Rock State Park or sell and use the proceeds for that purpose.
The State of North Carolina may not otherwise sell or exchange this
land.
c. The portion of that certain tract or parcel of property at Hanging Rock
State Park in Stokes County, Danbury Township, described in Deed
Book 368, Page 415, and containing 2,800 square feet as shown on the
survey prepared by Norman T. Scott entitled "Survey For David
Hoskins," dated May 20, 2020.
d. The portion of that certain tract or parcel of property at Hanging Rock
State Park in Stokes County, Yadkin Township, described in Deed
Book 588, Page 727, and containing 0.155 acres as shown on the
survey entitled "Plat of Survey for the State of North Carolina
Showing Proposed Boundary Line Agreement" by C.E. Robertson and
Associates, PC, dated March 14, 2023. The tract excluded from the
State Nature and Historic Preserve under this sub-subdivision is
deleted from the State Parks System in accordance with
G.S. 143B-135.54.
(13) Repealed by Session Laws 2022-31, s. 1, effective June 30, 2022.
(14) Repealed by Session Laws 2003-234, s. 1, effective June 19, 2003.
(15) All lands and waters within the boundaries of Jockey's Ridge State Park as of
May 2, 2023, May 6, 2025, with the exception of the following tracts:
a. The portion of those certain tracts or parcels of land at Jockey's Ridge
State Park in Dare County, Nags Head Township, described in Deed
Book 227, Page 499, and Deed Book 227, Page 501, and containing
33,901 square feet as shown on the survey prepared by Styons
Surveying Services entitled "Raw Water Well Site 13 Jockey's Ridge
State Park" dated March 7, 2001, and filed in the State Property Office.
b. The portion of that certain tract or parcel of land at Jockey's Ridge
State Park in Dare County, Nags Head Township, described in Deed
Book 222, Page 726, and containing 42,909 square feet as shown on
the survey prepared by Styons Surveying Services entitled "Raw
Water Well Site 14 Jockey's Ridge State Park" dated March 7, 2001,
and filed in the State Property Office.
c. The portion of that certain tract or parcel of land at Jockey's Ridge
State Park in Dare County, Nags Head Township, described in Deed
Book 224, Page 790, and Deed Book 224, Page 794, and containing
34,471 square feet as shown on the survey prepared by Styons
Surveying Services entitled "Raw Water Well Site 15 Jockey's Ridge
State Park" dated March 7, 2001, and filed in the State Property Office.
d. The portion of those certain tracts or parcels of land at Jockey's Ridge
State Park in Dare County, Nags Head Township, described in Deed
Book 227, Page 501, and Deed Book 230, Page 525, and containing
12,655 square feet as shown on the preliminary plat entitled "Easement
Survey for Town of Nags Head" prepared by Seaboard Surveying &
Planning, Inc., dated August 29, 2012.
Senate Bill 477 Session Law 2025-10 Page 7

e. The portion of that certain tract or parcel of property at Jockey's Ridge
State Park in Dare County, described in Deed Book 222, Page 732,
and Deed Book 227, Page 501, and containing 0.6 acres as shown in a
survey by Timmons Group entitled "Plat Showing a Proposed
Dominion North Carolina Power Easement Across the Properties of
the State of North Carolina (Jockey's Ridge State Park)," dated
December 18, 2014.
(16) All lands and waters located within the boundaries of Mount Jefferson State
Natural Area as of May 2, 2023. May 6, 2025. With respect to the
communications tower site on the top of Mount Jefferson and located on that
certain tract or parcel of land at Mount Jefferson State Natural Area in Ashe
County, West Jefferson Township, described in Deed Book F-3, Page 94, the
State may provide space at the communications tower site to State public
safety and emergency management agencies for the placement of antennas,
repeaters, and other communications devices for public communications
purposes. In conformance with G.S. 146-29.2, the State may lease space at the
communications tower site to local governments in Ashe County for the
placement of antennas, repeaters, and other communications devices for
public communications purposes. State agencies and local governments that
are authorized to place communications devices at the communications tower
site pursuant to this subdivision may also locate at or near the communications
tower site communications equipment that is necessary for the proper
operation of the communications devices. The use of the communications
tower site pursuant to this subdivision is authorized by the General Assembly
as a purpose other than the public purposes specified in Article XIV, Section
5, of the North Carolina Constitution, Article 25B of Chapter 143 of the
General Statutes, and Part 32 of Article 2 of Chapter 143B of the General
Statutes.
(17) All lands and waters within the Eno River State Park as of May 2, 2023, May
6, 2025, with the exception of the following tracts:
a. The portion of that certain tract or parcel of land at Eno River State
Park in Durham County, Durham Outside Township, described in
Deed Book 435, Page 673, and Plat Book 87, Page 66, containing
11,000 square feet and being the portion of Lot No. 2 shown as the
existing scenic easement hereby removed on the drawing prepared by
Sear-Brown entitled "Recombination Plat Eno Forest Subdivision"
bearing the preparer's file name 00-208-07.dwg, and filed with State
Property Office. The tract excluded from the State Nature and Historic
Preserve under this subdivision is deleted from the State Parks System
pursuant to G.S. 143B-135.54. The State of North Carolina may only
exchange this land for other land for the expansion of Eno River State
Park or sell this land and use the proceeds for that purpose. The State
may not otherwise sell or exchange this land.
b. The portion of that certain tract or parcel of land at Eno River State
Park in Orange County, described in Deed Book 3878, Page 461, and
Plat Book 98, Page 11, containing 5,313 square feet and required for
the permanent easements for bridge replacement project B-4216 on SR
1002 (St. Mary's Road), as shown in the drawing entitled "Preliminary
Plans, Project Reference No. B-4216" prepared for North Carolina
Department of Transportation by Mulkey Engineers and Consultants
dated March 10, 2009, and filed with the State Property Office. The
Page 8 Session Law 2025-10 Senate Bill 477

tracts excluded from the State Nature and Historic Preserve under this
section are deleted from the State Parks System pursuant to
G.S. 143B-135.54. The State of North Carolina may only exchange
this land for other land for the expansion of Eno River State Park or
sell this land and use the proceeds for that purpose. The State may not
otherwise sell or exchange this land.
(18) All land and waters within the boundaries of Hemlock Bluffs State Natural
Area as of May 2, 2023, May 6, 2025, with the exception of the following
tracts. The tracts excluded from the State Nature and Historic Preserve under
this subdivision are deleted from the State Parks System pursuant to
G.S. 143B-135.54. The State of North Carolina may only exchange this land
for other land for the expansion of Hemlock Bluffs State Natural Area or sell
this land and use the proceeds for that purpose. The State may not otherwise
sell or exchange this land. [The tracts are as follows:]
a. The portion of that certain tract or parcel of land at Hemlock Bluffs
State Natural Area in Wake County, Swift Creek Township, described
in Deed Book 2461, Page 037, containing 2,025 square feet and being
the portion of this tract shown as proposed R/W on the drawing
prepared by Titan Atlantic Group entitled "Right of Way Acquisition
Map for Town of Cary Widening of Kildaire Farm Road (SR 1300)
from Autumgate Drive to Palace Green" sheet 1 of 3 bearing the
preparer's file name Town of Cary Case File No. TOC 01-37, dated 26
September 2003, and filed with the State Property Office.
b. The portion of those certain tracts or parcels of land at Hemlock Bluffs
State Natural Area in Wake County, Swift Creek Township, described
in Deed Book 4670, Page 420, containing 24,092 square feet and being
the portion of these tracts shown as proposed R/W on the drawing
prepared by Titan Atlantic Group entitled "Right of Way Acquisition
Map for Town of Cary Widening of Kildaire Farm Road (SR 1300)
from Autumgate Drive to Palace Green" sheet 3 of 3 bearing the
preparer's file name Town of Cary Case File No. TOC 01-37, dated 26
September 2003, and filed with the State Property Office.
c. The portion of that certain tract or parcel of property in Wake County,
described in Deed Book 3135, Page 937, and containing 14.4 acres as
shown in a survey prepared by A. Roger Barnes (RLS) entitled
"Proposed Exchange of 14.4 Acres From the State of North Carolina
to the Town of Cary," dated August 19, 1988.
(19) All lands and waters within the boundaries of Lake James State Park as of
May 2, 2023, May 6, 2025, with the exception of the following tracts:
a. The portion of that certain tract or parcel of land at Lake James State
Park containing 13.85 acres, and being 100 feet to the east and 150
feet to the west of a centerline shown on a survey by Witherspoon
Surveying PLLC, dated February 9, 2007, and filed in the State
Property Office. The State of North Carolina may grant a temporary
easement to Duke Energy Corporation across this tract to facilitate the
Catawba Dam Embankment Seismic Stability Improvements Project.
The grant of the easement within Lake James State Park to Duke
Energy Corporation under this sub-subdivision constitutes
authorization by the General Assembly that the described tract of land
may be used for a purpose other than the public purposes specified in
Article XIV, Section 5, of the North Carolina Constitution, Article 25B
Senate Bill 477 Session Law 2025-10 Page 9

of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes, and Part 32 of Article 2 of
Chapter 143B of the General Statutes. The State of North Carolina
may use the proceeds from the easement only for the expansion or
improvement of Lake James State Park or another State park. The
State may not otherwise sell or exchange this land.
b. The portion of that certain tract or parcel of land at Lake James State
Park in McDowell County, Nebo Township, described in Deed Book
377, Page 423, and also shown as Tract B on the plat of survey
prepared by Kenneth D. Suttles, RLS, dated December 4, 1987,
entitled "Lake James State Park," Sheet 1 of 2, recorded in Plat Book
4, Page 275 of the McDowell County Registry, for a 40-foot
right-of-way beginning at the southwest corner of Tract B and
continuing along the southern boundary 86 38' 51 E for 400 feet to the
now or former John D. Walker property. The State of North Carolina
may grant an easement across this tract to extinguish prescriptive
easements on Tract B to improve management of the State park
property. The State may not otherwise sell or exchange this land. The
easement excluded from the State Nature and Historic Preserve under
this subdivision is deleted from the State Parks System pursuant to
G.S. 143B-135.54.
c. Repealed by Session Laws 2023-70, s. 13, effective June 30, 2023.
(20) All lands and waters within the boundaries of Lake Waccamaw State Park as
of May 2, 2023, May 6, 2025, with the exception of the following tracts:
a. The portions of that certain tract or parcel of land at Lake Waccamaw
State Park in Columbus County described in Deed Book 835, Page
590, containing 48,210 square feet and being the portion of this tract
shown as new R/W and permanent utility easement on drawing
prepared by State of North Carolina Department of Transportation
entitled "Map of Proposed Right of Way Property of State of North
Carolina (Parks and Recreation) Columbus County" for Tip B-3830
on SR 1947 (Bella Coola Road) done by John E. Kaukola, PLS No.
3999 and compiled 1-18-2008, and filed with the State Property
Office. The tracts excluded from the State Nature and Historic
Preserve under this section are deleted from the State Parks System
pursuant to G.S. 143B-135.54. The State of North Carolina may only
exchange this land for other land for the expansion of Lake Waccamaw
State Park or sell this land and use the proceeds for that purpose. The
State may not otherwise sell or exchange this land.
b. The portions of that certain tract or parcel of land at Lake Waccamaw
State Park in Columbus County, Bolton Township, described in Deed
Book 231, Page 597, containing 56,440 square feet and being the
portion of this tract shown as Option A and Proposed 20' Wide Utility
easement on a drawing entitled "Map for State of North Carolina and
Town of Lake Waccamaw" and filed with the State Property Office.
The grant of the easement within Lake Waccamaw State Park to the
Town of Lake Waccamaw under this section constitutes authorization
by the General Assembly that the described tract of land may be used
for a purpose other than the public purposes specified in Section 5 of
Article XIV of the North Carolina Constitution, Article 25B of Chapter
143 of the General Statutes, and Part 32 of Article 2 of Chapter 143B
of the General Statutes.
Page 10 Session Law 2025-10 Senate Bill 477

(21) All lands and waters within the boundaries of Chimney Rock State Park as of
May 2, 2023, May 6, 2025, with the exception of the following tracts:
a. The portion of that certain tract or parcel of land at Chimney Rock
State Park in Rutherford County being a portion of Parcel 2 as
described in Deed Book 933, Page 598, containing 346 square feet and
being shown as proposed right-of-way for bridge replacement project
B-4258 on U.S. 64 over the Broad River on drawing prepared by
Kimley-Horn and Associates for the North Carolina Department of
Transportation and revised October 26, 2007, and filed with the State
Property Office. The portion of that certain tract or parcel of land at
Chimney Rock State Park in Polk County, Cooper Gap Township,
Deed Book 393, Page 1402, containing 6.5 acres more or less and
shown on the survey entitled "Plat of Survey for The State of North
Carolina" prepared by Stacy Kent Rhodes dated May 15, 2014, and
filed with the State Property Office. The tracts excluded from the State
Nature and Historic Preserve under this section are deleted from the
State Parks System pursuant to G.S. 143B-135.54. The State of North
Carolina may only exchange this land for other land for the expansion
of Chimney Rock State Park or sell this land and use the proceeds for
that purpose. The State may not otherwise sell or exchange this land.
b. With respect to the communications tower site on Chimney Rock
Mountain located on a portion of that certain tract or parcel of land at
Chimney Rock State Park in Rutherford County, Chimney Rock
Township, described in Deed Book 933, Page 598, the State may
provide space at the communications tower site to State public safety,
emergency management, local governments in Rutherford County,
and public television agencies for the placement of antennas, repeaters,
and other communications devices for public communications
purposes. State agencies and local governments that are authorized to
place communications devices at or near the communications tower
site pursuant to this subdivision may also locate at or near the
communications tower site communications equipment necessary for
the proper operation of the communications devices. The use of the
communications tower site pursuant to this subdivision is authorized
by the General Assembly as a purpose other than the public purposes
specified in Section 5 of Article XIV of the North Carolina
Constitution, Article 25B of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes, and
Article 2 of Chapter 143B of the General Statutes.
c. Repealed by Session Laws 2022-31, s. 1, effective June 30, 2022.
d. The portion of that certain tract or parcel of land at Chimney Rock
State Park in Rutherford County, Chimney Rock Township, being
Parcel 2 as described in Deed Book 933, Page 598, containing 0.24
acres as shown on a survey prepared by Professional Surveying
Services entitled "Chimney Rock State Park," dated April 13, 2007.
The tract excluded from the State Nature and Historic Preserve under
this section is deleted from the State Parks System pursuant to
G.S. 143B-135.54. The State of North Carolina may only exchange
this land for other land for the expansion of Chimney Rock State Park
or sell this land and use the proceeds for that purpose. The State may
not otherwise sell or exchange this land.
Senate Bill 477 Session Law 2025-10 Page 11

e. The parcels of land at Chimney Rock State Park in Henderson County,
Edneyville Township, described in Deed Book 4140, Page 567,
containing 0.06 acres, 0.22 acres, and 0.15 acres, more or less, as
shown on a survey prepared by Kee Mapping & Surveying entitled "A
Boundary Survey for: North Carolina Division of Parks and
Recreation," dated September 27, 2023. The tract excluded from the
State Nature and Historic Preserve under this section is deleted from
the State Parks System pursuant to G.S. 143B-135.54. The State of
North Carolina may only exchange this land for other land for the
expansion of Chimney Rock State Park or sell this land and use the
proceeds for that purpose. The State may not otherwise sell or
exchange this land.
f. The portions of those parcels of land at Chimney Rock State Park in
Henderson County, Edneyville Township, Polk County, Cooper Gap
Township, and Rutherford County, Chimney Rock Township,
described as "Old Judes Gap Road" on the plat entitled "Plat of Survey
For Kelton G. McCraw, William D. McCraw, et al." recorded in
Rutherford County Plat Book 27, Page 228 and Henderson County
Plat File 2021 Slide 13308, containing 251,803 square feet, more or
less, and being a proposed 30-foot wide permanent redundant route for
AT&T interoffice fiber. The grant of the easement within Chimney
Rock State Park to AT&T under this section constitutes authorization
by the General Assembly that the described tract of land may be used
for a purpose other than the public purposes specified in Section 5 of
Article XIV of the North Carolina Constitution, Article 25B of Chapter
143 of the General Statutes, and Part 32 of Article 2 of Chapter 143B
of the General Statutes.
(22) All State-owned land and waters within the boundaries of the
Mountains-to-Sea Trail as of May 2, 2023, May 6, 2025, with the exception
of the following tract: The portion of that certain tract or parcel in Johnston
County described in Deed Book 3634, Page 278, containing 1.538 acres as
shown as the proposed easement area for Piedmont Natural Gas Company
transmission line on the drawing prepared by McKim & Creed entitled
"Easement Across The Land Of State of North Carolina," dated September
28, 2021, and revised October 6, 2021. The State of North Carolina may grant
an easement to Piedmont Natural Gas Company across this tract to facilitate
the transmission of natural gas. The grant of the easement within the
Mountains-to-Sea Trail to Piedmont Natural Gas Company under this section
constitutes authorization by the General Assembly that the described tract of
land may be used for a purpose other than the public purposes specified in
Section 5 of Article XIV of the North Carolina Constitution, Article 25B of
Chapter 143 of the General Statutes, and Part 32 of Article 2 of Chapter 143B
of the General Statutes. The State of North Carolina may use the proceeds
from the easement only for the expansion or improvement of the
Mountains-to-Sea Trail or another State park. The State may not otherwise
sell or exchange this land.
(23) All State-owned land and waters within the boundaries of Gorges State Park
as of May 2, 2023, May 6, 2025, with the exception of the following tracts.
The tracts excluded from the State Nature and Historic Preserve under this
subdivision are deleted from the State Parks System in accordance with
G.S. 143B-135.54. The State of North Carolina may only exchange this land
Page 12 Session Law 2025-10 Senate Bill 477

for other land for the expansion of Gorges State Park or sell this land and use
the proceeds for that purpose. The State may not otherwise sell or exchange
this land. [The tracts are as follows:]
a. The portions of that certain tract or parcel of land in Transylvania
County, described in Deed Book 267, Page 838, containing a total of
7.26 acres for the North Carolina Department of Transportation project
TIP R-2409C US 64 Safety Improvements. As shown on right-of-way
drawing from the North Carolina Department of Transportation dated
May 22, 2014, for TIP R-2409C, Parcel 002, on file with the State
Property Office.
b. Repealed by Session Laws 2023-70, s. 13, effective June 30, 2023.
(24) All State-owned land and waters within the boundaries of Lower Haw State
Natural Area as of May 2, 2023, May 6, 2025, with the exception of the
following tracts:
a. The portion of that certain tract or parcels in Chatham County,
described in Deed Book 1319, Page 1047, containing 12,501 square
feet and shown on a survey entitled "Recombination Survey for the
North Carolina Division of Parks and Recreation and PK Ventures I
LTD Partnership" prepared by S.D. Puckett and Associates dated April
22, 2014, and on file with the State Property Office. The tract excluded
from the State Nature and Historic Preserve under this subdivision is
deleted from the State Parks System in accordance with
G.S. 143B-135.54. The State of North Carolina may only exchange
this land for other land for the expansion of Lower Haw State Natural
Area or sell this land and use the proceeds for that purpose. The State
may not otherwise sell or exchange this land.
b. The portion of that certain tract or parcel of land at Lower Haw State
Natural Area in Chatham County, Center Township, containing 1,658
square feet and shown on a survey prepared by TEP Engineering
entitled "Permanent Electrical Easement Exhibit," dated June 15,
2020. The State of North Carolina may grant an easement to Conterra
Ultra Broadband across this tract to extend broadband services. The
grant of the easement within Lower Haw State Natural Area to
Conterra Ultra Broadband under this section constitutes authorization
by the General Assembly that the described tract of land may be used
for a purpose other than the public purposes specified in Section 5 of
Article XIV of the North Carolina Constitution, Article 25B of Chapter
143 of the General Statutes, and Part 32 of Article 2 of Chapter 143B
of the General Statutes.
(25) All State-owned land and waters within the boundaries of Lumber River State
Park as of May 2, 2023, May 6, 2025, with the exception of the following
tracts:
a. The portions of those certain tracts or parcels of land in Robeson
County, described in Deed Book 919, Page 862, Deed Book 1097,
Page 837, Deed Book 935, Page 170, Deed Book 1125, Page 562, and
Deed Book 1117, Page 680, containing a total of 3.39 acres for the
North Carolina Department of Transportation secondary road project
6C.078030 SR 2245 (VC Britt Road) and shown on the survey entitled
"Survey of Tracts 1A and 1B, VC Britt Rd, Orrum NC" prepared by
the North Carolina Department of Transportation. The tracts excluded
from the State Nature and Historic Preserve under this sub-subdivision
Senate Bill 477 Session Law 2025-10 Page 13

are deleted from the State Parks System in accordance with
G.S. 143B-135.54. The State of North Carolina may only exchange
this land for other land for the expansion of Lumber River State Park
or sell this land and use the proceeds for that purpose. The State may
not otherwise sell or exchange this land.
b. The portions of that certain tract or parcel of property at Lumber River
State Park in Robeson County, described in Deed Book 575, Page 523,
and containing approximately 1.08 acre (Tract A) and 0.12 acre (Tract
C) as shown in a survey by Jerry W. Lee entitled "Survey for State of
North Carolina" dated June 28, 2016. The land described in this
sub-subdivision is deleted from the State Park System in accordance
with G.S. 143B-135.54. The State of North Carolina may only
exchange this land for other land for the expansion of Lumber River
State Park or sell this land and use the proceeds for that purpose. The
State may not otherwise sell or exchange this land.
c. The portion of those certain tracts or parcels of land at Lumber River
State Park in Robeson County, Pembroke Township, described in
Deed Book 575, Page 523 and Deed Book 931, Page 415 and
containing a total of approximately 2.12 acres as shown in surveys
prepared by McKim and Creed and labeled Drawing Number
2017-041 and 2017-042 dated April 24, 2017, and on file with the
State Property Office.
d. The portion of that certain tract or parcel of land at Lumber River State
Park in Robeson County, described in Deed Book 1899, Page 479,
containing 0.5 acres and being a 20-foot wide easement beginning at
N.C. 711 (Country Club Road) and extending in a southerly direction
approximately 1,200 feet along the eastern boundary of the Elaine K.
Leggett tract, as shown on a survey prepared by W.E. Stone Jr.,
entitled "Map of Property in Raft Swamp TWP Robeson County N.C.,
Made For Estate of O.C. Norment," dated November 24, 1970. The
tracts excluded from the State Nature and Historic Preserve under this
sub-subdivision are deleted from the State Parks System in accordance
with G.S. 143B-135.54.
e. The portions of that certain tract or parcel of land at Lumber River
State Park in Robeson County, described in Deed Book 1134, Page 70,
containing a total of 9,572.57 square feet for the North Carolina
Department of Transportation Improvement Plan I-6064A
(Interstate-95 Widening) and shown on the drawing prepared by ICE
of Carolinas, PLLC, and filed in the State Property Office.
(26) All State-owned land and waters within the boundaries of Mitchells Millpond
State Natural Area as of May 2, 2023, May 6, 2025, with the exception of the
following tracts. The tracts excluded from the State Nature and Historic
Preserve under this subdivision are deleted from the State Parks System in
accordance with G.S. 143B-135.54. The State of North Carolina may only
exchange this land for other land for the expansion of the State Parks System
or sell this land and use the proceeds for that purpose. The State may not
otherwise sell or exchange this land. [The tracts are as follows:]
a. The portions of that certain tract or parcel in Wake County, described
in Deed Book 2445, Page 62, containing approximately 0.215 acres as
shown on the right-of-way plan for SR 2224 (Mitchell Mill Road)
Page 14 Session Law 2025-10 Senate Bill 477

bridge No. 162 replacement project and on file with the State Property
Office.
b. The portion of that certain tract or parcel of property at Mitchell's
Millpond State Natural Area in Wake County, described in Deed Book
4186, Page 756, and containing 0.08 acres as shown in a survey by the
North Carolina Department of Transportation, Right-of-Way Branch,
entitled "State of North Carolina, Parcel 002," dated March 11, 2015.
(27) All lands and waters within the boundaries of Carvers Creek State Park as of
May 2, 2023, May 6, 2025, with the exception of the following tract: the
portion of that certain tract or parcel of land at Carvers Creek State Park in
Cumberland County, described in Deed Book 8466, Page 67, and containing
0.33 acres, more or less, as shown on the survey entitled "Ingress-Egress
Easement for Stone Mountain Farm, LLC & William C. Elliott, Estate & The
State of North Carolina" by George L. Lott, PLS, dated November 2013, and
revised in May 2015 and filed with the State Property Office.
(28) All lands and waters within the boundaries of Mayo River State Park as of
May 2, 2023, May 6, 2025, with the exception of the following tracts, to tracts:
a. To allow construction of an access bridge from a tract or parcel of land
owned by the State of North Carolina over the Mayo River, which
bridge shall be of sufficient width to allow emergency vehicle and
State Park vehicle access for the purpose of addressing public safety
issues and service vehicle access to monitor, maintain, repair, or
replace the existing sewer line traversing portions of Mayo River State
Park:
a.1. The portion of that certain tract or parcel of land at Mayo River
State Park in Rockingham County described in Deed Book
1244, Page 1392, and containing 6.62 acres.
b.2. The portion of that certain tract or parcel of land at Mayo River
State Park in Rockingham County described in Deed Book
1244, Page 1390, and containing 0.62 acres.
c.3. The portion of that certain tract or parcel of land at Mayo River
State Park in Rockingham County described in Deed Book
1353, Page 2214, and containing 0.61 acres.
d.4. The portion of that certain tract or parcel of land at Mayo River
State Park in Rockingham County described in Deed Book
1353, Page 2216, and containing 0.52 acres.
e.5. The portion of that certain tract or parcel of land at Mayo River
State Park in Rockingham County described in Deed Book
1353, Page 2216, and containing 1.54 acres.
b. The portion of that certain tract or parcel of land in Rockingham
County, Mayo and Madison Townships, described in Deed Book
1552, Page 1261, and Deed Book 1518, Page 181, containing 0.394
acres, more or less, for the North Carolina Department of
Transportation Improvement Plan BR-0093 and shown on the drawing
prepared by the North Carolina Department of Transportation, and on
file with the State Property Office.
(29) Certain tracts within and in the vicinity of the National Landmark Historic
District of Bethania in Forsyth County containing approximately 189.84
acres, identified within the State Property Office file as those complexes
designated as Bethania Walnut Bluffs and Historic Bethabara Park, and
Senate Bill 477 Session Law 2025-10 Page 15

assigned to the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources as of May 2,
2023.May 6, 2025.
(30) All lands and waters located within the boundaries of the Occoneechee
Mountain State Natural Area as of May 2, 2023, May 6, 2025, with the
exception of the following tract: the portion of that certain tract or parcel of
land at Occoneechee Mountain State Natural Area in Orange County,
Hillsborough Township, described in Deed Book 6638, Page 2222, and Deed
Book 6638, Page 2227, containing 2,662.48 square feet for the North Carolina
Department of Transportation Improvement Plan I-3306A (Interstate-40
Widening) and shown on the drawing prepared by HDR Engineering, Inc., of
the Carolinas and filed in the State Property Office.
(31) All lands and waters located within the boundaries of South Mountains State
Park as of May 2, 2023, May 6, 2025, with the exception of the following
tract: with respect to the communications tower site on Walkertop Mountain
located on a portion of that certain tract or parcel of land at South Mountains
State Park in Burke County, Morganton Township, described in Deed Book
2654, Page 801, the State may provide space at the communications tower site
for the placement of broadband infrastructure on State land. In conformance
with G.S. 146-29.2, the State shall allow the collocation, installation, and
operation of equipment by a broadband provider on any existing structure
owned by the State. The use of the communications tower site pursuant to this
subdivision is authorized by the General Assembly as a purpose other than the
public purposes specified in Article XIV, Section 5, of the North Carolina
Constitution, Article 25B of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes, and Part 32
of Article 2 of Chapter 143B of the General Statutes.
(32) All State-owned land and waters within the boundaries of the Fonta Flora
State Trail as of May 6, 2025, with the exception of the following tract: the
portion of that certain tract or parcel in McDowell County, Old Fort
Township, described in Deed Book 1241, Page 916, containing 4,417 square
feet, more or less, as shown as the access and maintenance easement on the
survey prepared by Ed Holmes & Associates Land Surveyors, PA, entitled
"Relocated Access and Maintenance Easement For Slater Old Fort Properties,
LLC Across The Property of State of North Carolina," dated March 27, 2025.
The grant of the easement within the Fonta Flora State Trail under this section
constitutes authorization by the General Assembly that the described tract of
land may be used for a purpose other than the public purposes specified in
Section 5 of Article XIV of the North Carolina Constitution, Article 25B of
Chapter 143 of the General Statutes, and Part 32 of Article 2 of Chapter 143B
of the General Statutes. The State of North Carolina may use the proceeds
from the easement only for the expansion or improvement of the Fonta Flora
State Trail or another State Park. The State may not otherwise sell or exchange
this land."
Page 16 Session Law 2025-10 Senate Bill 477

EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 9. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
In the General Assembly read three times and ratified this the 11th day of June, 2025.
s/ Phil Berger
President Pro Tempore of the Senate
s/ Destin Hall
Speaker of the House of Representatives
s/ Josh Stein
Governor
Approved 8:53 a.m. this 13th day of June, 2025
Senate Bill 477 Session Law 2025-10 Page 17